Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 3

Publication of Water Quality Actions

69-3-301. Director's and commissioner's orders and enforcement actions and outcomes.

All director's and commissioner's orders and all other enforcement actions and outcomes, shall be published weekly in their entirety in one (1) location on the department's website.

Acts 2007, ch. 404, § 2.

69-3-302. Publication of final orders by the board or an administrative judge.

Final orders by the board or an administrative judge shall be published on the department website within five (5) business days, in addition to other publication required by law.

Acts 2007, ch. 404, § 3; 2013, ch. 181, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with, however when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

69-3-303. Notices of intent to appeal.

Notices of intent to appeal shall be published on the department website within three (3) business days of receipt, but no later than fourteen (14) days prior to the date the appeal or agreed order will be heard by the board, in addition to other publication required by law.

Acts 2007, ch. 404, § 4.

69-3-107. Duties and authority of the commissioner.